Utah statutes.
16-10a-732.   Shareholder agreements.
(1)  An agreement among the shareholders of a corporation that complies with
this section is effective among the shareholders and the corporation even
though it is inconsistent with one or more other provisions of this chapter in
that it:
(a)  eliminates the board of directors or restricts the discretion or powers
of the board of directors;
(b)  governs the authorization or making of distributions whether or not in
proportion to ownership of shares, subject to the limitations in Section
16-10a-640;
(c)  establishes who shall be directors or officers of the corporation, or
their terms of office or manner of selection or removal;
(d)  governs, in general or in regard to specific matters, the exercise or
division of voting power by or between the shareholders and directors or by or
among any of them, including use of weighted voting rights or director
proxies;
(e)  establishes the terms and conditions of any agreement for the transfer or
use of property or the provision of services between the corporation and any
shareholder, director, officer or employee of the corporation or among any of
them;
(f)  transfers to one or more shareholders or other persons all or part of the
authority to exercise the corporate powers or to manage the business and
affairs of the corporation, including the resolution of any issue about which
there exists a deadlock among directors or shareholders;
(g)  requires dissolution of the corporation at the request of one or more of
the shareholders or upon the occurrence of a specified event or contingency;
or
(h)  otherwise governs the exercise of the corporate powers or the management
of the business and affairs of the corporation or the relationship among the
shareholders, the directors and the corporation, or among any of them, and is
not contrary to public policy.
(2)  An agreement authorized by this section shall be:
(a)  set forth:
(i)  in the articles of incorporation or bylaws and approved by all persons
who are shareholders at the time of the agreement; or
(ii)  in a written agreement that is signed by all persons who are
shareholders at the time of the agreement and is made known to the
corporation;
(b)  subject to amendment only by all persons who are shareholders at the time
of the amendment, unless the agreement provides otherwise; and
(c)  valid for 10 years, unless the agreement provides otherwise.
(3)  The existence of an agreement authorized by this section shall be noted
conspicuously on the front or back of each certificate for outstanding shares
or on the information statement required by Section 16-10a-626(2).  If at the
time of the agreement the corporation has shares outstanding represented by
certificates, the corporation shall recall the outstanding certificates and
issue substitute certificates that comply with this subsection.  The failure
to note the existence of the agreement on the certificate or information
statement does not affect the validity of the agreement or any action taken
pursuant to it.  Any purchaser of shares who, at the time of purchase, did not
have knowledge of the existence of the agreement is entitled to rescission of
the purchase.  A purchaser is considered to have knowledge of the existence of
the agreement if its existence is noted on the certificate or information
statement for the shares in compliance with this subsection and, if the shares
are not represented by a certificate, the information statement is delivered
to the purchaser at or prior to the time of purchase of the shares.  An action
to enforce the right of rescission authorized by this subsection shall be
commenced within the earlier of 90 days after discovery of the existence of
the agreement or two years after the time of purchase of the shares.
(4)  An agreement authorized by this section shall cease to be effective when
shares of the corporation are listed on a national securities exchange or
regularly traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national
or affiliated securities association.  If the agreement ceases to be effective
for any reason, the board of directors may, if the agreement is contained or
referred to in the corporation's articles of incorporation or bylaws, adopt an
amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws, without shareholder
action, to delete the agreement and any references to it.
(5)  An agreement authorized by this section that limits the discretion or
powers of the board of directors shall relieve the directors of, and impose
upon the person or persons in whom the discretion or powers are vested,
liability for acts or omissions imposed by laws on directors to the extent
that the discretion or powers of the directors are limited by the agreement.
(6)  The existence or performance of an agreement authorized by this section
may not be a ground for imposing personal liability on any shareholder for the
acts or debts of the corporation even if the agreement or its performance
treats the corporation as if it were a partnership or results in failure to
observe the corporate formalities otherwise applicable to the matters governed
by the agreement.
(7)  Incorporators or subscribers for shares may act as shareholders with
respect to an agreement authorized by this section if no shares have been
issued when the agreement is made.
